Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2330.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 15 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER CMASTER-METER SYSTEM AND SUBMETERING PROGRAMFOR LANDLORD RATEPAYERSSec.1551. Declaration of policy.1552. Definitions.1553. Master-meter system and submetering program.1554. Tenant benefits.§ 1551. Declaration of policy.The General Assembly finds and declares that it is the policy 123456789101112131415161718 of the Commonwealth to encourage access for tenants and landlord ratepayers to energy technologies and efficiency through programs which offer master-meter systems and submetering options.§ 1552. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Conversion." The process of converting a residential building from the use of a multimeter system to a master-meter system."Energy efficiency." A reduction in overall consumption, measured in kilowatt hours, or the shifting of an amount of energy during a specified period of time, measured as demand in kilowatts."Master-meter system." A system by which public utility and electric generation services for a single residential building or complex of buildings are billed through a commercial public utility account. The term does not include a multimeter system."Multimeter system." A system by which each tenant holds an individual public utility account. The term does not include a master-meter system."Residential building." A building or complex of buildings containing one or more dwelling units occupied by one or more tenants. The term does not include nursing homes, hotels and motels or any dwelling of which the landlord ratepayer is the only resident, but does include mixed-use buildings containing both residential dwelling units and units designated for commercial use."Submetering." The process by which a landlord ratepayer 20260HB2330PN3232 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that receives energy through a master-meter system installs meters owned by the landlord ratepayer and bills individual tenants for their metered usage."Tenant." Any person or group of persons who are contractually obligated to make rental payments to the landlord ratepayer pursuant to a rental arrangement, including, but not limited to, an oral or written lease with the landlord ratepayer for a dwelling unit in a residential building or mobile home park which is provided gas, electric, steam, sewer or water as an included service under the rental agreement and who are not the ratepayers of the utility which supplied the gas, electric, steam, sewer or water service.§ 1553. Master-meter system and submetering program.(a) Establishment.--The commission shall establish a program for a landlord ratepayer or the landlord ratepayer's designated agent for the use of a master-meter system or submetering.(b) Criteria.--The commission shall ensure that the program established under subsection (a) complies with the following criteria:(1) Allows a landlord ratepayer an option to choose a master-meter service from a public utility for the landlord ratepayer's residential property in accordance with section 1313 (relating to price upon resale of public utility services).(2) Ensures that a master-meter system has certified and tested submeters for tenant bill accuracy.(3) Requires a landlord ratepayer that bills tenants for electric service to satisfy the requirements of section 1554 (relating to tenant benefits).(4) Verifies a lease agreement prior to a conversion.20260HB2330PN3232 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Includes applicable requirements for disconnection, including notice and payment plan requirements.(6) Mandates registration for a designated agent used by a landlord ratepayer for billing.(7) Has standards for the purchase or lease of equipment for contracts between a landlord ratepayer and a public utility.§ 1554. Tenant benefits.(a) Program established.--The commission shall establish a program that enables a property owner to utilize the property owner's business operation to participate in energy programs that deliver benefits to tenants through the use of master- metered service with submetering. The program shall provide benefits under the total bill cap as established under section 1313 (relating to price upon resale of public utility services).(b) Operation under master-metered system with submetering.--A landlord may operate under a master-metered system with submetering, provided that the landlord complies with the mandatory tenant protections and program requirements established under this section.(c) Tenant energy control and savings.--(1) A landlord shall satisfy at least one of the following:(i) Make available to each tenant or install in each tenant's unit at least one technology option that enables or assists the tenant's management of energy usage or which beneficially manages a tenant's energy usage. The options may include, but are not limited to:(A) the ability to shift energy consumption to different times of day;20260HB2330PN3232 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) tools or technologies that enable an overall reduction in energy usage or demand reduction for grid or peak reduction support; and(C) usage reduction technologies that provide predictive maintenance capabilities and actionable insights to identify water leaks, heating and air conditioning system deficiencies or other in-unit appliance or equipment concerns where the absence of predictive maintenance or insights may otherwise result in higher tenant utility bills due to equipment malfunction or failure.(ii) Guarantee that a tenant shall pay less for the tenant's electric usage than the maximum amount permitted under section 1313.(2) A public utility may include verified demand reduction or energy efficiency achieved through a master-metered system as a qualifying reduction for the purposes of shared savings or lost distribution revenue programs, as determined by the commission.(d) Baseline and efficiency reporting.--If data is available to the landlord, the landlord or an authorized representative shall submit to the commission a report documenting baseline energy usage and postimplementation efficiency improvements achieved under subsection (c). The reporting shall contribute toward applicable utility program mandates as determined by the commission.(e) Itemized utility billing.--If a lease agreement permits a landlord to charge a tenant for utility services, including water, sewer, gas, electricity, trash removal, Internet or any other charge not included in rent and the charges are billed 20260HB2330PN3232 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 separately from rent, the landlord shall provide an itemized bill that lists each charge as a distinct line item.(f) Electricity usage disclosure.--Any charge for electricity shall include the actual kilowatt-hour usage as recorded by the submeter for the tenant's specific dwelling unit.(g) Income assistance program disclosure.--A landlord shall provide residents with a notice with information regarding applicable income-based assistance programs. The notice shall include directions to the commission for the purpose of accessing the comprehensive registry of available customer assistance programs, grants and billing relief measures for which the resident may be eligible.(h) Technology use information.--A landlord shall provide tenants with clear instructions and informational materials explaining how to utilize any provided energy technology for the purpose of energy efficiency, demand response and cost savings.(i) Historical usage disclosure.--Prior to lease execution, a landlord shall provide prospective tenants with a 12-month history of electricity or water usage and associated costs for the dwelling unit, if the data is available.(j) Carbon reduction contribution.--(1) A landlord operating a master-metered system with submetering under this section shall provide a measurable contribution toward the reduction of carbon associated with the energy consumption of the property. The contribution may be satisfied through one or more of the following methods, as approved by the commission:(i) On-site generation of renewable energy.(ii) Procurement and retirement of renewable energy 20260HB2330PN3232 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 credits or verified carbon offset credits.(iii) Participation in a carbon reduction or clean energy program approved by the commission.(2) Any renewable energy credits or carbon offset credits used to satisfy the requirement under paragraph (1) shall be retired on behalf of the property or tenants through the PJM Generation Attribute Tracking System or a substantially similar tracking and retirement system approved by the commission. Credits may not be double-counted or resold after retirement.(3) The commission may establish minimum contribution levels, verification standards and reporting requirements to ensure that carbon reductions are real, additional and attributable to the master-metered property.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2330PN3232 - 7 - 123456789101112131415